Wyoming, session 2026, HB0145.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-3-102(a)(xxiii) and by creating a
new paragraph (xxiv), 39-15-105(a)(v) by creating a new
subparagraph (E), 39-17-301(a)(iii), (iv), (vii), (xiii),
(xvi), (xxv), (xxviii), (xxxviii), (xlviii) and by creating
new paragraphs (l) through (lii), 39-17-303(a) by creating
a new paragraph (iii), (c) by creating new paragraphs (ii)
and (iii), 39-17-304(a)(intro) and by creating a new
paragraph (iv), 39-17-307(a)(i) through (iv), (b)(i) and
(iii), 39-17-308(c)(ii) and 39-17-309(c)(i), (ii) and (iv)
are amended to read:
31-3-102. Miscellaneous fees.
(a) The following fees shall be collected for the
instruments or privileges indicated:
(xxiii) An annual decal which that shall include
the bucking horse and rider emblem for a plug-in registered
and licensed electric an all-electric vehicle as defined in
W.S. 39-17-301(a)(xxxviii) 39-17-301(a)(l) .$200.00 $100.00
(xxiv) An annual decal that shall include the
bucking horse and rider emblem for a plug-in hybrid
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
electric vehicle as defined in W.S.
39-17-301(a)(xxxviii)............................... $50.00
39-15-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following sales or leases are exempt from the
excise tax imposed by this article:
(v) For the purpose of exempting sales of
services and tangible personal property which are
alternatively taxed, the following are exempt:
(E) Sales of alternative fuels taxed under
W.S. 39-17-301 through 39-17-311.
39-17-301. Definitions.
(a) As used in this article:
(iii) "Alternative fuels" includes pure
methanol, ethanol and other alcohols, blends of eighty-five
percent (85%) or more of alcohol with gasoline, natural
gas, liquid fuels produced from natural gas, liquefied
petroleum gas or propane, coal-derived liquid fuels,
hydrogen, electricity sold or dispensed at a DC fast
charging station, pure biodiesel (B100), fuels other than
alcohol which are derived from biological materials,
renewable diesel and P-Series fuels. The state of Wyoming
may designate by rule other fuels as alternative fuels if
not previously defined as fuels under this chapter;
(iv) "Billed gallons" means the gallons,
gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE), or diesel gallon
equivalent (DGE) or kilowatt hours billed to the customer;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(vii) "Bulk alternative fuel" means thirty-five
(35) gallons or more or the gasoline gallon equivalent, or
the diesel gallon equivalent, or gasoline gallon equivalent
for electricity delivered at one (1) time, excluding
alternative fuels delivered into the attached tanks or
auxiliary tanks of a licensed motor vehicle;
(xiii) "Dealer" means any person who dispenses,
sells or offers to sell alternative fuel at a specific
location in this state, including any person selling or
offering to sell alternative fuel at Wyoming airports;
(xvi) "Dispenser" means the point of taxation
for compressed natural gas, and liquefied natural gas and
any other alternative fuel designated by the department.
The "dispenser" is the point where the gas alternative fuel
is delivered into the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle;
(xxv) "Gasoline gallon equivalent" or "GGE"
means the gasoline gallon equivalent applied to
nonliquefied compressed natural gas in the amount of five
and sixty-six hundredths (5.66) pounds of compressed
natural gas;. The gasoline gallon equivalent applied to
electricity is 33.56 kilowatt hours (kWh);
(xxviii) "Hybrid electric vehicle" means a
vehicle that uses two (2) or more distinct power sources to
move the vehicle neither of which can be recharged from any
external source of electricity including a wall socket.
"Hybrid electric vehicle" includes a vehicle which includes
an internal combustion engine and one (1) or more electric
motors but vehicles which that use other mechanisms to
capture and use energy may also be included. "Hybrid
electric vehicle" does not include an all-electric vehicle
or a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle;
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(xxxviii) "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle"
means any motor vehicle that uses two (2) or more distinct
power sources to move the vehicle and one (1) of which can
be recharged from any external source of electricity,
including a wall socket, and the electricity stored in the
rechargeable battery drives or contributes to drive the
wheels of the vehicle. "Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle"
does not include a hybrid electric vehicle, an all-electric
vehicle, a motorcycle as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(E)
or a multipurpose vehicle as defined in W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);
(xlviii) "User" means any person who uses
alternative fuel within this state in an internal
combustion engine for the generation of power to propel a
motor vehicle upon a highway;
(l) "All-electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle
that uses only electric energy to propel the vehicle, can
be recharged from an external source of electricity and can
use stored electricity to drive or contribute to driving
the wheels of the motor vehicle. "All-electric vehicle"
shall not include a hybrid electric vehicle, a plug-in
hybrid electric vehicle, a motorcycle as defined in W.S.
31-1-101(a)(xv)(E) or a multipurpose vehicle as defined in
W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xv)(M);
(li) "Charge" means to receive and store
electric energy;
(lii) "DC (direct current) fast charging
station" means a device used to charge a plug-in hybrid
electric vehicle or an all-electric vehicle that meets the
definition of "DC Level 1," "DC Level 2" or "DC Level 3" as
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
defined in Standard J1772 of the SAE International
standards and any future updates to those standards, or an
equivalent power output level.
39-17-303. Imposition.
(a) Taxable event. The following shall apply:
(iii) There is levied and shall be collected a
license tax on all electric energy sold or dispensed for
sale or use in this state for charging a plug-in hybrid
electric vehicle or an all-electric vehicle at a DC fast
charging station.
(c) Taxpayer. The following shall apply:
(ii) Each dealer dispensing or selling
electricity for charging motor vehicles at a DC fast
charging station shall collect the license tax imposed by
this article and is liable for the entire amount of license
taxes imposed. Each DC fast charging station shall be
metered as to the amount of electric energy sold or
dispensed for charging;
(iii) Every person who sells or offers to sell
to the retail trade electricity at a DC fast charging
station for use in motor vehicles shall conspicuously
display the price per kilowatt hour including all
applicable taxes.
39-17-304. Taxation rate.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by this section and
W.S. 39-17-305, the total tax on alternative fuel used to
propel a motor vehicle shall be twenty-four cents ($.24)
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
per gallon. The gasoline gallon equivalent (GGE) shall be
used for compressed natural gas, or liquid petroleum gas.
or electricity. The diesel gallon equivalent (DGE) shall be
used for liquefied natural gas or renewable diesel. The
rate shall be imposed as follows:
(iv) Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) through
(iii) of this subsection, there is levied and shall be
collected a license tax of three and one-half cents ($.035)
per kilowatt hour on all electricity sold or dispensed for
sale or use in this state to propel a motor vehicle except
for electricity exempted under W.S. 39-17-305.
39-17-307. Compliance; collection procedures.
(a) Returns and reports. The following shall apply:
(i) On or before the last day of each month a
date required by department rule:
(A) When alternative fuel is purchased to
propel a motor vehicle or distributed in Wyoming from a
Wyoming licensed supplier, the supplier shall report, using
the appropriate equivalency formula, to the department all
gallons or kilowatt hours sold in the state during the
preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due for
alternative fuel sold to an end user;
(B) When alternative fuel is purchased out
of Wyoming for use, sale or distribution to propel a motor
vehicle in Wyoming, the Wyoming licensed supplier shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours used, sold or
distributed during the preceding calendar month and remit
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
all taxes due under this article for fuel sold to an end
user;
(C) Each Wyoming licensed supplier with a
Wyoming retail location shall report, using the appropriate
equivalency formula, to the department all gallons or
kilowatt hours of alternative fuel used to propel a motor
vehicle during the preceding calendar month and remit taxes
due under this article for fuel sold to an end user or a
retail location;
(D) When alternative fuel is purchased in
Wyoming from a Wyoming licensed refiner, the refiner shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons used, sold or distributed during the
preceding calendar month and remit all taxes due for fuel
sold to an end user;
(E) Each Wyoming licensed distributor,
importer, exporter with Wyoming retail locations shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours of alternative
fuel imported and used to propel a motor vehicle during the
preceding calendar month and remit taxes due under this
article for fuel sold to an end user or a retail location;
(F) Each Wyoming licensed importer shall
report, using the appropriate equivalency formula, to the
department all gallons or kilowatt hours imported and used
to propel a motor vehicle during the preceding calendar
month and remit taxes due under this article for fuel sold
to an end user unless the tax has been paid to an
out-of-state licensed supplier;
7

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(G) Any person acquiring biodiesel (B100),
ethanol or other alcohols, methanol, butane or other
blending components to blend with gasoline, diesel or
alternative fuels shall report to the department all
gallons of biodiesel (B100) ethanol or other alcohols, and
methanol, butane or other blending components, purchased
and blended during the preceding calendar month any period
as required by department rule and remit all additional
taxes due.
(ii) Each person transporting, conveying or
bringing alternative fuel used to propel a motor vehicle
into this state for sale, use or distribution in this state
shall furnish the department a verified statement showing
the number of gallons or kilowatt hours, using the
appropriate equivalency formula, of alternative fuel
delivered during the month any period as required by
department rule and preceding the report, the name of the
person to whom the delivery was made and the place of
delivery;
(iii) Each person who exports alternative fuel
from this state shall report the number of gallons or
kilowatt hours exported, using the appropriate equivalency
formula, the destination state and the name of the person
to whom exported;
(iv) On or before the last day of each month a
date required by department rule:
(A) Each dealer, who is not licensed as a
distributor, shall submit a statement to the department in
a format required by the department showing the number of
gallons, gasoline gallon equivalent, kilowatt hours or
diesel gallon equivalent of alternative fuel acquired, the
8

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
person who supplied the alternative fuel and the total
gallons, kilowatt hours or gallon equivalents sold during
the preceding calendar month or dispensed and remit any
taxes due if the point of taxation is at the dispenser;
(B) Each distributor or importer shall, if
applicable, submit a statement to the department in a
format required by the department for the preceding
calendar month for the purpose of obtaining a refund from
the department for taxes paid pursuant to this section.
(b) Payment. The following shall apply:
(i) On or before the last day of each month a
date required by department rule, every supplier, refiner,
terminal operator, importer and dealer shall pay to the
department all license taxes imposed by this article which
are due based upon the statement submitted under W.S.
39-17-307(a)(i). Payment may be made by electronic funds
transfer;
(iii) A distributor or importer who owns a bulk
plant in this state may take a shrinkage credit of one
percent (1%) on gross gallons, if applicable, of bulk
alternative fuel purchased directly from a terminal and
delivered in this state for use, sale or distribution. This
credit may be claimed on the monthly any tax return
required by department rule. A distributor or importer who
does not own a bulk plant, but owns retail locations and
distributes alternative fuel to those locations only shall
be entitled to the shrinkage credit on gross gallons, if
applicable, of bulk alternative fuel delivered. The
shrinkage credit may not apply to some alternative fuels.
The department shall promulgate rules which specify the
9

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
applicability of the credit and provide an application
process for the credit.
39-17-308. Enforcement.
(c) Penalties. The following shall apply:
(ii) If any person fails or refuses to file the
monthly a statement as required by department rule and
remit the tax as provided by W.S. 39-17-307(a)(i), the
department shall make a statement for that person from the
best information available and from such statement shall
determine the amount of license taxes required to be paid
and add thereto a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the taxes
due. The department shall notify the delinquent taxpayer of
the total amount due by serving written notice upon such
person personally or by United States mail to the last
known address as shown on the records of the department. If
the delinquent taxpayer proves to the department that the
delinquency was due to a reasonable cause, the department
shall waive the penalty provided in this paragraph. If the
delinquent taxpayer after receiving the statement prepared
by the department later renders to the department a true
statement covering the same calendar month period, the
department shall use such statement, adding the penalty of
ten percent (10%) and interest of one percent (1%) per
month on the license taxes from the due date until payment.
The penalty shall be waived by the department upon
satisfactory written proof the delinquency was due to a
reasonable cause;
39-17-309. Taxpayer remedies.
(c) Refunds. The following shall apply:
10

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) On or before the last day of each month a
date required by department rule, every distributor shall,
if applicable, submit a statement to the department on
forms furnished by or in a format required by the
department for the preceding calendar month for the purpose
of obtaining a refund from the department for taxes paid
pursuant to W.S. 39-17-307(a)(i);
(ii) Any person exporting alternative motor
vehicle fuel from Wyoming for which the license tax has
been paid is subject to a refund of the license tax paid.
The refund request shall be submitted on or before the last
day of the month a date required by department rule on
forms provided by or in a format required by the
department. The refund request is invalid if not submitted
within one (1) year of the date of purchase;
(iv) The department shall by rule promulgated
pursuant to W.S. 39-17-302(a) prescribe procedures under
which an alternative fuel user who is entitled to at least
a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) refund of tax under
this article for purchases and use of alternative fuel to
propel a motor vehicle in any calendar month may apply for
and receive the refund at any time after the last day of
that month according to a timeline required by the
department pursuant to department rule;
Section 2. The department of transportation and the
department of revenue shall promulgate all rules necessary
to implement this act.
11

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0145
ENROLLED ACT NO. 33, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
12